Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 11

Intractable Pain Treatment Act [Repealed]

63-6-1101. [Repealed]

Acts 2001, ch. 327, §§ 2-12; 2001, ch. 436, § 3; 2012, ch. 848, § 73; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.Acts 2001, ch. 327, § 2; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 63, ch. 6, part 11, §§ 63-6-1101 – 63-6-1111, concerned the Intractable Pain Treatment Act.

Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 2 provided that within one hundred eighty (180) days of July 1, 2015, the board of medical examiners shall promulgate a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, to repeal any rule or regulation promulgated by the board under the authority conferred by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-1111.

63-6-1102. [Repealed]

Acts 2001, ch. 327, § 3; 2012, ch. 848, § 73; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 63, ch. 6, part 11, §§ 63-6-1101 – 63-6-1111, concerned the Intractable Pain Treatment Act.

Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 2 provided that within one hundred eighty (180) days of July 1, 2015, the board of medical examiners shall promulgate a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, to repeal any rule or regulation promulgated by the board under the authority conferred by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-1111.

63-6-1103. [Repealed]

Acts 2001, ch. 327, § 4; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 63, ch. 6, part 11, §§ 63-6-1101 – 63-6-1111, concerned the Intractable Pain Treatment Act.

Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 2 provided that within one hundred eighty (180) days of July 1, 2015, the board of medical examiners shall promulgate a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, to repeal any rule or regulation promulgated by the board under the authority conferred by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-1111.

63-6-1104. [Repealed]

Acts 2001, ch. 327, § 5; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 63, ch. 6, part 11, §§ 63-6-1101 – 63-6-1111, concerned the Intractable Pain Treatment Act.

Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 2 provided that within one hundred eighty (180) days of July 1, 2015, the board of medical examiners shall promulgate a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, to repeal any rule or regulation promulgated by the board under the authority conferred by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-1111.

63-6-1105. [Repealed]

Acts 2001, ch. 327, § 6; ; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 63, ch. 6, part 11, §§ 63-6-1101 – 63-6-1111, concerned the Intractable Pain Treatment Act.

Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 2 provided that within one hundred eighty (180) days of July 1, 2015, the board of medical examiners shall promulgate a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, to repeal any rule or regulation promulgated by the board under the authority conferred by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-1111.

63-6-1106. [Repealed]

Acts 2001, ch. 327, § 7; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2015

Compiler's Notes. Former title 63, ch. 6, part 11, §§ 63-6-1101 – 63-6-1111, concerned the Intractable Pain Treatment Act.

Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 2 provided that within one hundred eighty (180) days of July 1, 2015, the board of medical examiners shall promulgate a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, to repeal any rule or regulation promulgated by the board under the authority conferred by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-1111.

63-6-1107. [Repealed]

Acts 2001, ch. 327, § 8; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2015

Compiler's Notes. Former title 63, ch. 6, part 11, §§ 63-6-1101 – 63-6-1111, concerned the Intractable Pain Treatment Act.

Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 2 provided that within one hundred eighty (180) days of July 1, 2015, the board of medical examiners shall promulgate a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, to repeal any rule or regulation promulgated by the board under the authority conferred by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-1111.

63-6-1108. [Repealed]

Acts 2001, ch. 327, § 9; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 63, ch. 6, part 11, §§ 63-6-1101 – 63-6-1111, concerned the Intractable Pain Treatment Act.

Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 2 provided that within one hundred eighty (180) days of July 1, 2015, the board of medical examiners shall promulgate a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, to repeal any rule or regulation promulgated by the board under the authority conferred by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-1111.

63-6-1109. [Repealed]

Acts 2001, ch. 327, § 10; 2001, ch. 436, § 3; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 63, ch. 6, part 11, §§ 63-6-1101 – 63-6-1111, concerned the Intractable Pain Treatment Act.

Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 2 provided that within one hundred eighty (180) days of July 1, 2015, the board of medical examiners shall promulgate a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, to repeal any rule or regulation promulgated by the board under the authority conferred by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-1111.

63-6-1110. [Repealed]

Acts 2001, ch. 327, § 11; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 63, ch. 6, part 11, §§ 63-6-1101 – 63-6-1111, concerned the Intractable Pain Treatment Act.

Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 2 provided that within one hundred eighty (180) days of July 1, 2015, the board of medical examiners shall promulgate a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, to repeal any rule or regulation promulgated by the board under the authority conferred by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-1111.

63-6-1111. [Repealed]

Acts 2001, ch. 327, § 12; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 63, ch. 6, part 11, §§ 63-6-1101 – 63-6-1111, concerned the Intractable Pain Treatment Act.

Acts 2015, ch. 26, § 2 provided that within one hundred eighty (180) days of July 1, 2015, the board of medical examiners shall promulgate a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, to repeal any rule or regulation promulgated by the board under the authority conferred by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-1111.